District of Columbia statutes.
11-2301

Repealed

Medical Examiner; Deputies; appointment, qualifications, and compensation.

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 518, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 148(a)
1981 Ed., § 11-2301.
1973 Ed., § 11-2301.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 13-104 which enacted the Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Temporary Act of 1999, added definitions of unusual incident and ward.
Section 7 (b) of D.C. Law 13-104 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90-day) requirement of certain autopsies and reports, see §§ 2 to 5 of the Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-232, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 515).
For temporary (90-day) requirement of certain autopsies and reports, see §§ 2 to 5 of the Mandatory Autopsy for Deceased Wards of the District of Columbia and Mandatory Unusual Incident Report Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-309, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2730).

Functions vested in the Department of Public Health were transferred to the Department of Human Resources by Commissioner’s Order No. 70-83, dated March 6, 1970. The Department of Human Resources was replaced by the Department of Human Services by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, dated February 21, 1980.

Establishment of Commission on Medical Examiner’s Office: See Mayor’s Order 89-62, March 28, 1989.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made, in brackets, in this section.